Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1357
Affirmative Action Office; created.

There is hereby created the Affirmative Action Office which shall be within the personnel division of the Department of Administrative Services. The office shall be under the administrative control of the Director of Personnel.

Laws 1979, LB 500, § 3;

Laws 1992, Third Spec. Sess., LB 14, § 24.